Tennessee, session 114, SB0373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-5-110(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following immediately after the first sentence:
If a project is located in more than one (1) county, then the final right-of-way plans must
be filed and recorded in each county where the project is located.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0373
001278
- 1 -